Hawaii statutes.
§142-11 Forfeiture of animals, etc.
All animals, fodder, fittings, or effects landed contrary to this chapter or
taken or removed from quarantine before being duly discharged, shall be
forfeited to the use of the State. All animals brought into quarantine grounds
or placed with any animals under quarantine or placed into provisional
quarantine, shall be deemed to come under this chapter and shall be subject to
all the conditions of the same. [L 1882, c 34, §7; am L 1905, c 81, §2; RL
1925, §617; RL 1935, §212; RL 1945, §1062; RL 1955, §20-12; HRS §142-11; am L
1986, c 115, §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next